Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska12-804
Sections, how construed.

The provisions of sections 12-801 to 12-804 shall be deemed cumulative with and supplemental to any laws of the State of Nebraska relating to the establishment or operation of cemeteries and the powers of the trustees or other governing bodies thereof.

Laws 1945, c. 15, § 4, p. 116.